California statutes. Public Resources Code
 enforcement of this subdivision.

(2) Upon the expiration of the emergency regulations no more than 180 days after adoption, the department shall adopt regulations pursuant to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code to implement this section.

(c) A dealer cooperative shall do all of the following:

(1) Submit a redemption plan to the department to provide redemption in one or more unserved convenience zones. Redemption programs shall include sufficient redemption opportunities for consumers that have comparable consumer convenience to the requirements of Section 14571 and include, but are not limited to, pilot projects described in Section 14571.9.

(2) Assess fees on the dealers in the zone or zones covered by the redemption plan necessary to cover operational costs and implementation of the approved plan.

(3) (A) Redeem all material types and offer one or more redemption locations within the dealer cooperative zone.

(B) The dealer cooperative may contract to provide the redemption opportunities approved in the plan.

(4) Be operational and fully implement the approved redemption plan.

(5) Register as a dealer cooperative with the department.

(6) Provide reports as
 required by the department, which may include, but are not limited to, the amount of empty beverage containers, by material type and weight of container or material, redeemed in the past month and any other relevant information the department requests in the form and manner that the department may prescribe.

(d) (1) Except as provided in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 14571.6, dealer cooperatives may be eligible for reimbursement of California Redemption Value funds paid to consumers, processing payments, handling fees, and administrative fees unless a certified recycling center operates in a convenience zone in which a dealer participating in the dealer cooperative is located.

(2) In order to receive payment from a
 processor, dealer cooperative redemption identification shall be verified.

(3) The department may delay payments to a dealer cooperative for up to seven days until the verification of the received weight versus the actual redemption weight of beverage containers occurs.

(e) The department may revoke a dealer cooperative’s registration or the plan for failure to provide redemption for consumers.

(f) The department shall audit each cooperative at least once every 24 months to ensure that proper program payments are made to consumers and cooperative fees are being utilized for the operation of the approved redemption model.

(g) The department may assess civil
 penalties under Section 14591.1 for violations of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 319, Sec. 3.   (SB 955)   Effective September 18, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 7. Financial Provisions [14580. - 14587.]

14580.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (d), the department shall deposit all amounts paid as redemption payments by distributors pursuant to Section 14574 and all other revenues received into the California Beverage Container Recycling Fund, which is hereby created in the State Treasury. Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, the money in the fund is hereby continuously appropriated to the department for expenditure without regard to fiscal year for the following purposes:

(1) The payment of refund values and administrative fees to processors pursuant to Section 14573.

(2) For a reserve for contingencies, which shall not be greater than an amount equal to 5 percent of the total amount paid to processors pursuant to Section 14573 during the preceding
 calendar year, plus the interest earned on that amount.

(b) The money in the fund may be expended by the department for the administration of this division only upon appropriation by the Legislature in the annual Budget Act.

(c) After setting aside funds estimated to be needed for expenditures authorized pursuant to this section, the department shall set aside funds on a quarterly basis for the purposes specified in Section 14581. Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, that money is hereby continuously appropriated to the department, without regard to fiscal year, for the purposes specified in Section 14581.

(d) The department shall deposit all civil penalties or fines collected pursuant to this division into the Penalty Account, which is hereby created in the fund. The money in the Penalty Account may be expended by the department only upon appropriation by the Legislature, for purposes of this division.

(e) The Legislature finds and declares that the maintenance of the fund is of the utmost importance to the state and that it is essential that any money in the fund be used solely for the purposes authorized in this division and should not be used, loaned, or transferred for any other purpose.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, 8th Ex. Sess., Ch. 5, Sec. 4.   (AB 7 8x)   Effective March 8, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

14581.

(a) Subject to the availability of funds and in accordance with subdivision (b), the department shall expend the moneys set aside in the fund, pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 14580, for the purposes of this section in the following manner:

(1) For each fiscal year, the department may expend the amount necessary to make the required handling fee payment pursuant to Section 14585.

(2) Fifteen million dollars ($15,000,000) shall be expended annually for payments for curbside programs and neighborhood dropoff programs pursuant to Section 14549.6.

(3) (A) Ten million five hundred thousand dollars ($10,500,000)
 may be expended annually for payments of five thousand dollars ($5,000) to cities and ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for payments to counties for beverage container recycling and litter cleanup activities, or the department may calculate the payments to counties and cities on a per capita basis, and may pay whichever amount is greater, for those activities.

(B) Eligible activities for the use of these funds may include, but are not necessarily limited to, support for new or existing curbside programs, neighborhood dropoff programs, public education promoting beverage container recycling, litter prevention, and cleanup, cooperative regional efforts among two or more cities or counties, or both, or other beverage container recycling programs.

(C) These funds shall not be used for activities unrelated to beverage container recycling or litter reduction.

(D) To receive these funds, a city, county, or city and county shall fill out and return a funding request form to the department. The form shall specify the beverage container recycling or litter reduction activities for which the funds will be used.

(E) The department shall annually prepare and distribute a funding request form to each city, county, or city and county. The form shall specify the amount of beverage container recycling and litter cleanup funds for which the jurisdiction is eligible. The form shall not exceed one double-sided page in length, and may be submitted electronically. If a city, county, or city and county does not return the funding request form within 90 days of receipt of the form from the department, the city, county, or city and county is not eligible to receive the funds for that funding cycle.

(F) For the purposes of this paragraph, per capita population shall be based on the population of the incorporated area of a city or city and county and the unincorporated area of a county. The department may withhold payment to any city, county, or city and county that has prohibited the siting of a supermarket site, caused a supermarket site to close its business, or adopted a land use policy that restricts or prohibits the siting of a supermarket site within its jurisdiction.

(4) One million five hundred thousand dollars ($1,500,000) may be expended annually in the form of grants for beverage container recycling and litter reduction programs.

(5) (A) The department shall expend the amount necessary to pay the processing payment established pursuant to Section 14575. The department shall establish separate processing fee accounts in the fund
 for each beverage container material type for which a processing payment and processing fee are calculated pursuant to Section 14575, or for which a processing payment is calculated pursuant to Section 14575 and a voluntary artificial scrap value is calculated pursuant to Section 14575.1, into which account shall be deposited both of the following:

(i) All amounts paid as processing fees for each beverage container material type pursuant to Section 14575.

(ii) Funds equal to the difference between the amount in clause (i) and the amount of the processing payments established in subdivision (b) of Section 14575, and adjusted pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of, and subdivision (f) of, Section 14575, to reduce the processing fee to the level provided in subdivision (e) of Section 14575, or to reflect the agreement by a willing purchaser to pay a voluntary artificial
 scrap value pursuant to Section 14575.1.

(B) Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, the moneys in each processing fee account are hereby continuously appropriated to the department for expenditure without regard to fiscal years, for purposes of making processing payments pursuant to Section 14575.

(6) Up to five million dollars ($5,000,000) may be expended annually by the department for the purposes of undertaking a statewide public education and information campaign aimed at promoting increased recycling of beverage containers.

(7) Up to fifteen million dollars ($15,000,000) may be expended annually by the department for quality incentive payments for empty glass beverage containers pursuant to Section 14549.1.

(8) (A) For the 2019–20 fiscal year to the 2028–29 fiscal year, inclusive, the department may expend funds for market development payments to reclaimers and product manufacturers, pursuant to Section 14549.2.

(B) For the purposes of implementing subparagraph (A), the following amounts may be expended by the department:

(i) Up to thirty-five million dollars ($35,000,000) in the 2026–27 fiscal year.

(ii) Up to thirty million dollars ($30,000,000) in the 2027–28 fiscal year.

(iii) Up to twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000) in the 2028–29 fiscal year.

(C) For the 2026–27 fiscal year to the 2028–29 fiscal year, inclusive, the department may expend up to up to five million ($5,000,000) annually to establish a grant program to support plastic reclaimers and manufacturers operating in California that invest in equipment, facility operations, or other infrastructure necessary to process postconsumer plastic beverage containers and manufacture products using recycled plastic feedstock.

(D) For
 purposes of this paragraph, the definitions in subdivision (a) of Section 14549.2 apply.

(9) (A) For the 2019–20 fiscal year to the 2025–26 fiscal year, inclusive, the department may expend up to a total of five million dollars ($5,000,000) to support the pilot projects created pursuant to Section 14571.9.

(B) Taking into consideration the recent closure of many of California’s recycling centers, the Legislature finds and declares that the appropriation provided for in Chapter 793 of the Statutes of 2019 is necessary in order to ensure the continued support of, and to bolster, consumer redemption opportunities.

(10) The department may expend up to four million dollars ($4,000,000) annually for glass processing incentive grants authorized pursuant to Section 14543.

(11) The department may expend up to four million dollars ($4,000,000) annually for empty glass beverage container grants authorized pursuant to Section 14544.

(12) The department may expend up to one million dollars ($1,000,000) annually for grants to facilitate the transportation of empty glass beverage containers authorized pursuant to Section 14545.

(13) (A) (i) The department may expend up to sixty million dollars ($60,000,000) annually for glass market development payments for glass authorized pursuant to Section 14549.7.

(ii) This subparagraph shall become inoperative on January 1, 2028.

(B) (i) Notwithstanding
 subdivision (c) of Section 14580, upon appropriation by the Legislature specifically for purposes of this subparagraph, on and after January 1, 2028, the department may expend up to twenty million dollars ($20,000,000) annually for glass market development payments authorized pursuant to Section 14549.7.

(ii) This subparagraph shall become inoperative on January 1, 2030.

(b) (1) If the department determines, pursuant to a review made pursuant to Section 14556, that there may be inadequate funds to pay the payments required by this division, the department shall immediately notify the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature regarding the inadequacy.

(2) On or before 180 days, but not less than 80 days, after the notice is sent pursuant to paragraph (1), the department may
 reduce or eliminate expenditures, or both, from the funds as necessary, according to the procedure set forth in subdivision (c).

(c) If the department determines that there are insufficient funds to make the payments specified pursuant to this section and Section 14575, the department shall reduce all payments proportionally.

(d) Before making an expenditure pursuant to paragraph (6) of subdivision (a), the department shall convene an advisory committee consisting of representatives of the beverage industry, beverage container manufacturers, environmental organizations, the recycling industry, nonprofit organizations, and retailers to advise the department on the most cost-effective and efficient method of the expenditure of the funds for that education and information campaign.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 62, Sec. 7.   (SB 166)   Effective July 6, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

14581.1.

(a) The department shall expend in each fiscal year, from the moneys set aside in the fund pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 14580, twenty million nine hundred seventy-four thousand dollars ($20,974,000), plus the cost-of-living adjustment, as provided in subdivision (c), less fifteen million dollars ($15,000,000), in the form of grants for beverage container litter reduction programs and recycling programs, including education and outreach, issued to either of the following:

(1) Certified community conservation corps that were in existence on September 30, 1999, or that are formed subsequent to that date, that are designated by a city or a city and county to perform litter abatement, recycling, and related activities, if the city or the city and county
 has a population, as determined by the most recent census, of more than 250,000 persons.

(2) Community conservation corps that are designated by a county to perform litter abatement, recycling, and related activities, and are certified by the California Conservation Corps as having operated for a minimum of two years and as meeting all other criteria of Section 14507.5.

(b) The grants provided pursuant to this section shall not comprise more than 75 percent of the annual budget of a community conservation corps, except for the 2026–27 fiscal year.

(c) The amount of twenty million nine hundred seventy-four thousand dollars ($20,974,000) that is referenced in subdivision (a) is a base amount for the 2014–15 fiscal year, and the department shall adjust that amount annually to reflect any increases or decreases in the cost of living as measured by the Department of Labor or a successor agency of the federal government.

(d) For the 2014–15 fiscal year only, the amount to be expended from the fund for the purposes specified in subdivision (a) shall be increased by seven million five hundred thousand dollars ($7,500,000).

(e) For the 2026-27 fiscal year only, the amount to be expended from the fund for purposes specified in subdivision (a) shall be increased by sixty million dollars ($60,000,000).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 254, Sec. 3.   (SB 178)   Effective September 18, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

14582.

The Recycling Infrastructure Loan Guarantee Account is hereby created as a revolving account in the California Beverage Container Recycling Fund, and the funds in that account are continuously appropriated to the department to issue loan guarantees for capital expenditures for new recycling infrastructure located in the state. The department may issue a loan guarantee from the account only if the department determines that the new recycling infrastructure adds recycling capacity, results in remanufacturing and reuse of beverage containers into new products, and complies with all applicable laws and regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 753, Sec. 18.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

14583.

Notwithstanding Section 14581, on and after July 1, 2012, the department shall not make any payments, grants, or loans, as provided in that section, to a city, county, or city and county, if the city, county, or city and county has adopted or is enforcing a land use restriction that prevents the siting or operation of a certified recycling center at a supermarket site, as defined in Section 14526.6, as may be required pursuant to Section 14571.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 576, Sec. 1.   (AB 712)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

14584.

(a) Operators of reverse vending machines or processors may apply to the Capital Programs and Climate Financing Authority for financing pursuant to Section 44526 of the Health and Safety Code, as a means of obtaining capital for establishment of a convenience network. For purposes of Section 44508 of the Health and Safety Code, “project” includes the establishing of a recycling location pursuant to the division.

(b) Corporations, companies, or individuals may apply for loan and grant funds from the Energy Technologies Research,
 Development, and Demonstration Account specified in Section 25683 by applying to the State Energy Resources Conservation and Development Commission for the purpose of demonstrating equipment for enhancing recycling opportunities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 710, Sec. 16.   (AB 786)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

14585.

(a) The department shall adopt guidelines and methods for paying handling fees to supermarket sites, nonprofit convenience zone recyclers, or rural region recyclers to provide an incentive for the redemption of empty beverage containers in convenience zones. The guidelines shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) Handling fees shall be paid on a monthly basis, in the form and manner adopted by the department. The department shall require that claims for the handling fee be filed with the department not later than the first day of the second month following the month for which the handling fee is claimed as a condition of receiving any handling fee.

(2) The department shall determine the number of eligible containers per site for which a handling fee will be paid in the following manner:

(A) Each eligible site’s combined monthly volume of glass and plastic beverage containers shall be divided by the site’s total monthly volume of all empty beverage container types.

(B) If the quotient determined pursuant to subparagraph (A) is equal to, or more than, 10 percent, the total monthly volume of the site shall be the maximum volume that is eligible for a handling fee for that month.

(C) If the quotient determined pursuant to subparagraph (A) is less than 10 percent, the department shall divide the volume of glass
 and plastic beverage containers by 10 percent. That quotient shall be the maximum volume that is eligible for a handling fee for that month.

(3) (A) On and after the effective date of the act amending this section during the 2023–24 Regular Session, and until June 30, 2026, the department shall pay a handling fee per eligible container in the amount determined pursuant to subdivisions (f) and (g).

(B) On and after July 1, 2026, the department shall pay a handling fee per eligible container in the amount determined pursuant to subdivision (f).

(4) If the eligible volume in any given month would result in handling fee payments that exceed the allocation of funds for that month, as provided in subdivision
 (b), sites with higher eligible monthly volumes shall receive handling fees for their entire eligible monthly volume before sites with lower eligible monthly volumes receive any handling fees.

(5) (A) If a dealer where a supermarket site, nonprofit convenience zone recycler, or rural region recycler is located ceases operation for remodeling or for a change of ownership, the operator of that supermarket site, nonprofit convenience zone recycler, or rural region recycler shall be eligible to apply for handling fees for that site for a period of three months following the date of the closure of the dealer.

(B) Every supermarket site operator, nonprofit convenience zone recycler, or rural region recycler shall promptly notify the department of the closure of
 the dealer where the supermarket site, nonprofit convenience zone recycler, or rural region recycler is located.

(C) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), any operator who fails to provide notification to the department pursuant to subparagraph (B) shall not be eligible to apply for handling fees.

(b) The department may allocate the amount authorized for expenditure for the payment of handling fees pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 14581 on a monthly basis and may carry over any unexpended monthly allocation to a subsequent month or months. However, unexpended monthly allocations shall not be carried over to a subsequent fiscal year for the purpose of paying handling fees but may be carried over for any other purpose pursuant to Section 14581.

(c) Except as provided in Section 14571.6, all of the following apply to the payment of handling fees:

(1) The department shall not make handling fee payments to more than one certified recycling center in a convenience zone. If a dealer is located in more than one convenience zone, the department shall offer a single handling fee payment to a supermarket site located at that dealer. This handling fee payment shall not be split between the affected zones. The department shall stop making handling fee payments if another recycling center certifies to operate within the convenience zone without receiving payments pursuant to this section, if the department monitors the performance of the other recycling center for 60 days and determines that the recycling center is in compliance with
 this division. Any recycling center that locates in a convenience zone, thereby causing a preexisting recycling center to become ineligible to receive handling fee payments, is ineligible to receive any handling fee payments in that convenience zone.

(2) The department shall offer a single handling fee payment to a rural region recycler located anywhere inside a convenience zone, if that convenience zone is not served by another certified
 recycling center and the rural region recycler does either of the following:

(A) Operates a minimum of 30 hours per week in one convenience zone.

(B) Serves two or more convenience zones, and meets all of the following criteria:

(i) Is the only certified recycler within each convenience zone.

(ii) Is open and operating at least eight hours per week in each convenience zone and is certified at each location.

(iii) Operates at least 30 hours per week in total for all convenience zones served.

(d) The department may require
 an operator of a supermarket site, or an operator of a rural region recycler, receiving handling fees to maintain records for each location where beverage containers are redeemed, and may require the supermarket site or rural region recycler to take any other action necessary for the department to determine that the supermarket site or rural region recycler does not receive an excessive handling fee.

(e) The department may determine and use a standard container per pound rate, for each material type, for purposes of calculating volumes and making handling fee payments.

(f) (1) On or before January 1, 2008, and every two years thereafter, the department shall conduct a survey pursuant to this subdivision of a statistically significant sample of handling fee payment
 recipients to determine the actual cost incurred for the redemption of empty beverage containers by those handling fee payment recipients. The department shall conduct these cost surveys in conjunction with the cost surveys performed by the department pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 14575 to determine processing payments and processing fees. The department shall include, in determining the actual costs, only those allowable costs contained in the regulations adopted pursuant to this division that are used by the department to conduct cost surveys pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 14575.

(2) Using the information obtained pursuant to paragraph (1), the department shall then determine the statewide weighted average cost incurred for the redemption of empty beverage containers, per empty beverage container, by handling fee payment
 recipients.

(3) Except as provided in subdivision (g), the department shall determine the amount of the handling fee to be paid for each empty beverage container as follows:

(A) Until June 30, 2032, and except as provided in subparagraph (B), the amount shall be determined using a methodology established by the department reflecting the cost of providing and maintaining recycling in convenience zones by handling fee recipients, including transportation, labor, volume, consumer convenience, and increasing recycling rates. The methodology may include tiered handling fee rates reflecting differing costs within
 convenience zones or regions based on respective volume or location. This subparagraph shall become inoperative on July 1, 2032.

(B) On and after June 30, 2026, and if the department has not established a method pursuant to subparagraph (A), the amount shall be determined by subtracting the amount of the statewide weighted average cost per container to redeem empty beverage containers by handling fee payment recipients that do not receive handling fees from the amount of the statewide weighted average cost per container determined pursuant to paragraph (2).

(4) The department shall adjust the statewide
 average cost determined pursuant to paragraph (2) for each beverage container annually to reflect changes in the cost of living, as measured by the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the United States Department of Labor or a successor agency of the United States government.

(5) The cost information collected pursuant to this section for handling fee payment recipients shall not be used in the calculation of the processing payments determined pursuant to Section 14575.

(g) (1) On and after the effective date of the act amending this section during the 2023–24 Regular Session, and until June 30, 2026, the per-container handling fee shall not be less than the amount of the per-container handling fee that was in effect on July 1, 2023. If the effective date of the act amending
 this section during the 2023–24 Regular Session is after July 1, 2024, the department shall pay eligible handling fee payment recipients the difference between the handling fee in effect on July 1, 2024, and the handling fee that was in effect on July 1, 2023, so that the per-container handling fee for the 2025–26 fiscal year is no less than the handling fee that was in effect on July 1, 2023.

(2) The department shall adjust the handling fee established by this subdivision annually to reflect changes in the cost of living, as measured by the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the United States Department of Labor or a successor agency of the United States government.

(h) (1) The department shall adopt emergency regulations that establish the methodology
 described in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (f) and to establish a handling fee calculated pursuant to the methodology. The regulations shall take effect no later than July 1, 2026.

(2) Until June 30, 2032, the adoption of regulations described in paragraph (1) shall be deemed to be an emergency and necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, or general welfare for purposes of Sections 11346.1 and 11349.6 of the Government Code, and the department is hereby exempted from the requirement that it describe facts showing the need for immediate action. Notwithstanding Section 11346.1 of the Government Code,
 the emergency regulations adopted pursuant to this subdivision shall remain in effect through June 30,
 2032.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 319, Sec. 4.   (SB 955)   Effective September 18, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

14585.5.

(a) The department shall not make handling fee payments to a supermarket site if the department determines that all empty beverage container types are not redeemed at the same physical location within the recycling location.

(b) A supermarket site that redeems all empty beverage container types at the same physical location within the recycling location, and issues script to consumers which is required to be redeemed at a nearby host business, is eligible to receive handling fee payments.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 620, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

14586.

This division does not create any guarantee of a continuing level of support, or other obligation on the part of the State of California, the department, or any agency thereof, to pay any specified amount to any local conservation organization, community conservation corps, or statewide nonprofit private agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1290, Sec. 2.   Effective September 29, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

14587.

This division does not require or create any obligation that payments made pursuant to this division to any local conservation organization, community conservation corps, or statewide nonprofit private agency in any given fiscal year be made in any subsequent fiscal year at the same or greater level.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1290, Sec. 2.   Effective September 29, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 7.5. Penalties for Unfair Recycling Competition [14588. - 14588.2.]

14588.

It is the intent of the Legislature that handling fees paid to supermarket site recycling centers pursuant to Section 14585 shall only be used to offset the unique costs of providing convenient recycling opportunities to consumers at supermarket sites, and that those fees may not be expended for the purpose of engaging in unfair and predatory competition in order to reduce recycling rates of other recycling centers certified pursuant to this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 815, Sec. 36.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

14588.1.

(a) As used in this chapter, “unfair and predatory pricing” means the payment to consumers by a supermarket site, that receives handling fees for the redemption of beverage containers, in an amount that exceeds the sum of both of the following:

(1) The California refund value for that container.

(2) (A) If the supermarket site is not located in a rural region, the average scrap value paid per pound for that container type by specified certified recycling centers located within a five-mile radius of the supermarket site on the date of the alleged occurrence, the day before the alleged occurrence, and the day after the alleged occurrence.

(B) If the supermarket site is located in a rural region, the average scrap value paid per pound for that container type by specified certified recycling centers located within a 10-mile radius of the supermarket site on the date of the alleged occurrence, the day before the alleged occurrence, and the day after the alleged occurrence.

(b) In calculating the three-day average price paid by recyclers within the specified distance of a recycler alleged to have engaged in predatory pricing, as required by subdivision (a), the department shall only survey those recyclers who did not receive handling fees in three or more of the 12 whole months immediately preceding the date of the allegation of predatory pricing.

(c) For purposes of this chapter, “rural region” means a nonurban area identified by the department on an annual basis using the loan eligibility criteria of the Rural Housing Service of the United States Department of Agriculture, Rural Development Administration, or its successor agency. Those criteria include, but are not limited to, places, open country, cities, towns, or census designated places with populations that are less than 10,000 persons. The department may designate an area with population of between 10,000 and 50,000 persons as a rural region, unless the area is identified as part of, or associated with, an urban area, as determined by the department on an individual basis.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 696, Sec. 22.   Effective September 30, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

14588.2.

(a) To ensure that handling fees paid to a supermarket site are not used for the purpose of engaging in unfair and predatory pricing, and to otherwise further the intent of this chapter, the department shall follow all of the requirements of this section upon the complaint of either of the following:

(1) Any certified recycler located within five miles of the supermarket site alleged to have engaged in unfair and predatory pricing if not located in a rural region.

(2) Any certified recycler located within 10 miles of the supermarket site alleged to have engaged in unfair and predatory pricing if located in a rural region.

(b) (1) Within 50 days of receiving the complaint, the department shall complete an audit of the payments for the redemption of beverage containers being paid by the supermarket site, and by all other certified recycling centers as specified in Section 14588.1, for the purpose of determining whether the supermarket site is engaged in unfair and predatory pricing.

(2) The department shall withhold from public disclosure any proprietary information collected by the department in the course of the audit mandated by paragraph (1). The department shall exercise its discretion in determining what information is proprietary.

(c) (1) If the director determines there is probable cause that a supermarket site, against which a complaint has been made, has engaged in unfair and predatory pricing, the director shall, within 60 days of receiving the complaint, convene an informal hearing before the director, or the director’s designee.

(2) At least 10 days before the hearing, the director shall forward the results of the audit to the complainant and respondent.

(3) At the hearing, the director, or the director’s designee, shall review the audit conducted pursuant to subdivision (b) and any evidence presented by the complainant that a supermarket site has engaged in unfair and predatory pricing. The director, or the director’s designee, shall also review any evidence presented by the respondent that the respondent has not engaged in unfair and predatory pricing.

(4) The respondent shall be given the opportunity to rebut the presumption of unfair and predatory pricing imposed by Section 14588.1 by demonstrating to the satisfaction of the director, or the director’s designee, that the respondent did both of the following:

(A) The respondent made a good faith effort to determine the average scrap value paid per pound for that container type by certified recycling centers located within a five-mile or 10-mile radius of the supermarket site, pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 14588.1, within 30 days before the date of the alleged violation.

(B) The three-day average scrap value the respondent paid per pound for that container type was within 2.5 percent of the three-day average scrap value paid per pound determined by the department pursuant to subdivision (a).

(5) The director, or the director’s designee, may dismiss a complaint made pursuant to subdivision (a) upon determining either of the following:

(A) The complaint is without basis.

(B) The complaint is repetitious of prior similar complaints against the same supermarket site for which the director or the director’s designee has determined that no unfair and predatory pricing occurred.

(d) Within 20 days of the completion of the hearing, the director, or the director’s designee, shall determine whether the supermarket site has engaged in unfair and predatory pricing. This determination shall be based upon the audit conducted pursuant to subdivision (b), and upon any clear and convincing evidence of unfair and predatory pricing presented at the hearing.

(e) During the time period from the date of the receipt of a complaint pursuant to subdivision (a), until the date the director makes a determination pursuant to subdivision (d), the supermarket site against which the allegation of unfair and predatory pricing is made shall not receive handling fees that were earned during the period commencing with the date of the alleged unfair and predatory pricing. However, nothing in this subdivision shall affect the payment of handling fees to a supermarket site that is found not to have engaged in unfair and predatory pricing pursuant to this section, or to the activities of a supermarket site prior to the date of the alleged unfair and predatory pricing.

(f) If, after complying with the procedure established pursuant to this section, the director, or the director’s designee, determines that a supermarket site has engaged in unfair and predatory pricing, the site is ineligible to receive handling fees as specified by this section.

(1) If the determination of unfair and predatory pricing is the first for the site, the site is ineligible to receive handling fees for six months from the date that the respondent is found to have engaged in unfair and predatory pricing.

(2) If the determination of unfair and predatory pricing is the second for the site, the site is ineligible to receive handling fees for one year from the date that the respondent is found to have engaged in unfair and predatory pricing.

(3) If the determination of unfair and predatory pricing is the third or more for the site, the site is ineligible to receive handling fees for five years after the date that the respondent is found to have engaged in unfair and predatory pricing.

(g) The complainant or respondent may obtain a review of the determination made pursuant to this section by filing in the superior court a petition for a writ of mandate within 30 days following the issuance of the determination. Section 1094.5 of the Code of Civil Procedure shall govern judicial proceedings pursuant to this subdivision, except that the court shall exercise its independent judgment. If a petition for a writ of mandate is not filed within the time limits set forth in this subdivision, the determination made pursuant to this subdivision is not subject to review by any court or agency.

(h) If either party appeals the determination of the director, or the director’s designee, pursuant to subdivision (g), and the department prevails, the department may recover any costs associated with its defense of the complaint.
